District of Columbia statutes.
47-3404

Annual payment by the United States — Appropriations — Deficiency.

If in any fiscal year or years a deficiency exists between the amount appropriated and the amount authorized by this article to be appropriated, additional appropriations are hereby authorized for subsequent fiscal years to pay such deficiency or deficiencies.

History

July 16, 1947, 61 Stat. 361, ch. 258, art. VI, § 2
May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 113, ch. 218, title VII, § 701
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 83, ch. 154, § 401
June 6, 1958, 72 Stat. 183, Pub. L. 85-451, § 2
Aug. 27, 1963, 77 Stat. 130, Pub. L. 88-104, § 1
Sept. 30, 1966, 80 Stat. 857, Pub. L. 89-610, title V, § 501
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-3404.
1973 Ed., § 47-2501b.

References in Text

The reference to “this article” in this section is to art. VI, 61 Stat. 361, ch. 258, approved July 16, 1947.